Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1310
Covered online service; covered minor; privacy settings; acts prohibited.

A covered online service shall not:

(1) Provide a covered minor with a single setting that makes all of the default privacy settings less protective at once; or

(2) Request or prompt a covered minor to make the covered minor's privacy settings less protective, unless the change is strictly necessary for the covered minor to access a service or feature that such covered minor has expressly and unambiguously requested.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 33.
July 18, 2026